Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1798.01
Board of Nursing; duties.

The Board of Nursing shall recommend annually to the Department of Health and Human Services the percentage of all nursing fees collected during the year that are to be used to cover the cost of the Nebraska Center for Nursing, except that the percentage shall not be greater than fifteen percent of the biennial revenue derived from the fees.

Laws 2005, LB 243, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 488.